apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="aa-os/hil__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilym</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilmayd</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilee</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilee</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilee</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilee</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilym</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilysmayd</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilys</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilys</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilys</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilys</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilin</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilagh</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilagh</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilagh</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilagh</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilagh</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ley</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil-shiu</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hil</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hilit</l>
          <r>hil<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="surr__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysmayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anse</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-shiu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="curn/aght__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aght</l>
          <r>aght<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeyn</l>
          <r>aght<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aa-oshil"><par n="initial-a"/><i>a-os</i><par n="aa-os/hil__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="curnaght"><par n="initial-c"/><i>urn</i><par n="curn/aght__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="surr"><par n="initial-s"/><i>urr</i><par n="surr__vblex"/></e>
